Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-4645
Contract; effect.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) or (3) of this section, a contract between a city and a utility entered into under sections 19-4641 to 19-4645 shall bar the city from initiating condemnation proceedings during the period provided for in the contract.

(2) If the utility, by act or omission, breaches the contract, the city may pursue action in the district court of the county in which the city is located to have the court determine whether a material breach has occurred. If the court determines that a material breach has occurred, the city may initiate proceedings to condemn the gas system notwithstanding that the term of relinquishment set out in the contract has not expired.

(3) Except upon the express written approval of the city, the utility may not assign or transfer its interest in the contract to an independent third party.

Laws 2002, LB 384, § 22.